Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3332
Animal therapist; license; application;
qualifications.

Each
applicant for a license as an animal therapist in this state shall present
to the department:

(1) Proof that
the applicant holds and maintains an undisciplined license under the Uniform
Credentialing Act for a health care profession other than veterinary medicine
and surgery;

(2) Proof that the applicant has met the standards for additional
training regarding the performance of that health care profession on animals
as required by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department
upon the recommendation of the board; and

(3) Such other information and proof as
the department, with the recommendation of the board, may require by rule
and regulation.

Laws 2009, LB463, § 9.